dict/fr-moderne.aff
FLAG long
SFX b3 Y 254
SFX b3 er er/25 er 21
SFX b3 er ant/25 [^c]er 22
SFX b3 cer çant/25 cer 22
SFX b3 ecer èce/26 ecer 27
SFX b3 emer ème/26 emer 27
SFX b3 ener ène/26 ener 27
SFX b3 eper èpe/26 eper 27
SFX b3 erer ère/26 erer 27
SFX b3 eser èse/26 eser 27
SFX b3 ever ève/26 ever 27
SFX b3 evrer èvre/26 evrer 27
SFX b3 eter ète/26 eter 27
SFX b3 eler èle/26 eler 27
SFX b3 ecer èces/27 ecer 28
SFX b3 emer èmes/27 emer 28
SFX b3 ener ènes/27 ener 28
SFX b3 eper èpes/27 eper 28
SFX b3 erer ères/27 erer 28
SFX b3 eser èses/27 eser 28
SFX b3 ever èves/27 ever 28
SFX b3 evrer èvres/27 evrer 28
SFX b3 eter ètes/27 eter 28
SFX b3 eler èles/27 eler 28
SFX b3 ecer èce/28 ecer 29
SFX b3 emer ème/28 emer 29
SFX b3 ener ène/28 ener 29
SFX b3 eper èpe/28 eper 29
SFX b3 erer ère/28 erer 29
SFX b3 eser èse/28 eser 29
SFX b3 ever ève/28 ever 29
SFX b3 evrer èvre/28 evrer 29
SFX b3 eter ète/28 eter 29
SFX b3 eler èle/28 eler 29
SFX b3 er ons [^c]er 30
SFX b3 cer çons cer 30
SFX b3 er ez er 31
SFX b3 ecer ècent/28 ecer 32
SFX b3 emer èment/28 emer 32
SFX b3 ener ènent/28 ener 32
SFX b3 eper èpent/28 eper 32
SFX b3 erer èrent/28 erer 32
SFX b3 eser èsent/28 eser 32
SFX b3 ever èvent/28 ever 32
SFX b3 evrer èvrent/28 evrer 32
SFX b3 eter ètent/28 eter 32
SFX b3 eler èlent/28 eler 32
SFX b3 er ais/26 [^c]er 33
SFX b3 cer çais/26 cer 33
SFX b3 er ais/27 [^c]er 34
SFX b3 cer çais/27 cer 34
SFX b3 er ait/28 [^c]er 35
SFX b3 cer çait/28 cer 35
SFX b3 er ions er 36
SFX b3 er iez er 37
SFX b3 er aient/28 [^c]er 38
SFX b3 cer çaient/28 cer 38
SFX b3 er ai/26 [^c]er 39
SFX b3 cer çai/26 cer 39
SFX b3 er as/27 [^c]er 40
SFX b3 cer ças/27 cer 40
SFX b3 er a/28 [^c]er 41
SFX b3 cer ça/28 cer 41
SFX b3 er âmes [^c]er 42
SFX b3 cer çâmes cer 42
SFX b3 er âtes [^c]er 43
SFX b3 cer çâtes cer 43
SFX b3 er èrent/28 er 44
SFX b3 ecer ècerai/26 ecer 45
SFX b3 emer èmerai/26 emer 45
SFX b3 ener ènerai/26 ener 45
SFX b3 eper èperai/26 eper 45
SFX b3 erer èrerai/26 erer 45
SFX b3 eser èserai/26 eser 45
SFX b3 ever èverai/26 ever 45
SFX b3 evrer èvrerai/26 evrer 45
SFX b3 eter èterai/26 eter 45
SFX b3 eler èlerai/26 eler 45
SFX b3 ecer èceras/27 ecer 46
SFX b3 emer èmeras/27 emer 46
SFX b3 ener èneras/27 ener 46
SFX b3 eper èperas/27 eper 46
SFX b3 erer èreras/27 erer 46
SFX b3 eser èseras/27 eser 46
SFX b3 ever èveras/27 ever 46
SFX b3 evrer èvreras/27 evrer 46
SFX b3 eter èteras/27 eter 46
SFX b3 eler èleras/27 eler 46
SFX b3 ecer ècera/28 ecer 47
SFX b3 emer èmera/28 emer 47
SFX b3 ener ènera/28 ener 47
SFX b3 eper èpera/28 eper 47
SFX b3 erer èrera/28 erer 47
SFX b3 eser èsera/28 eser 47
SFX b3 ever èvera/28 ever 47
SFX b3 evrer èvrera/28 evrer 47
SFX b3 eter ètera/28 eter 47
SFX b3 eler èlera/28 eler 47
SFX b3 ecer ècerons ecer 48
SFX b3 emer èmerons emer 48
SFX b3 ener ènerons ener 48
SFX b3 eper èperons eper 48
SFX b3 erer èrerons erer 48
SFX b3 eser èserons eser 48
SFX b3 ever èverons ever 48
SFX b3 evrer èvrerons evrer 48
SFX b3 eter èterons eter 48
SFX b3 eler èlerons eler 48
SFX b3 ecer ècerez ecer 49
SFX b3 emer èmerez emer 49
SFX b3 ener ènerez ener 49
SFX b3 eper èperez eper 49
SFX b3 erer èrerez erer 49
SFX b3 eser èserez eser 49
SFX b3 ever èverez ever 49
SFX b3 evrer èvrerez evrer 49
SFX b3 eter èterez eter 49
SFX b3 eler èlerez eler 49
SFX b3 ecer èceront/28 ecer 50
SFX b3 emer èmeront/28 emer 50
SFX b3 ener èneront/28 ener 50
SFX b3 eper èperont/28 eper 50
SFX b3 erer èreront/28 erer 50
SFX b3 eser èseront/28 eser 50
SFX b3 ever èveront/28 ever 50
SFX b3 evrer èvreront/28 evrer 50
SFX b3 eter èteront/28 eter 50
SFX b3 eler èleront/28 eler 50
SFX b3 ecer ècerais/26 ecer 51
SFX b3 emer èmerais/26 emer 51
SFX b3 ener ènerais/26 ener 51
SFX b3 eper èperais/26 eper 51
SFX b3 erer èrerais/26 erer 51
SFX b3 eser èserais/26 eser 51
SFX b3 ever èverais/26 ever 51
SFX b3 evrer èvrerais/26 evrer 51
SFX b3 eter èterais/26 eter 51
SFX b3 eler èlerais/26 eler 51
SFX b3 ecer ècerais/27 ecer 52
SFX b3 emer èmerais/27 emer 52
SFX b3 ener ènerais/27 ener 52
SFX b3 eper èperais/27 eper 52
SFX b3 erer èrerais/27 erer 52
SFX b3 eser èserais/27 eser 52
SFX b3 ever èverais/27 ever 52
SFX b3 evrer èvrerais/27 evrer 52
SFX b3 eter èterais/27 eter 52
SFX b3 eler èlerais/27 eler 52
SFX b3 ecer ècerait/28 ecer 53
SFX b3 emer èmerait/28 emer 53
SFX b3 ener ènerait/28 ener 53
SFX b3 eper èperait/28 eper 53
SFX b3 erer èrerait/28 erer 53
SFX b3 eser èserait/28 eser 53
SFX b3 ever èverait/28 ever 53
SFX b3 evrer èvrerait/28 evrer 53
SFX b3 eter èterait/28 eter 53
SFX b3 eler èlerait/28 eler 53
SFX b3 ecer ècerions ecer 54
SFX b3 emer èmerions emer 54
SFX b3 ener ènerions ener 54
SFX b3 eper èperions eper 54
SFX b3 erer èrerions erer 54
SFX b3 eser èserions eser 54
SFX b3 ever èverions ever 54
SFX b3 evrer èvrerions evrer 54
SFX b3 eter èterions eter 54
SFX b3 eler èlerions eler 54
SFX b3 ecer èceriez ecer 55
SFX b3 emer èmeriez emer 55
SFX b3 ener èneriez ener 55
SFX b3 eper èperiez eper 55
SFX b3 erer èreriez erer 55
SFX b3 eser èseriez eser 55
SFX b3 ever èveriez ever 55
SFX b3 evrer èvreriez evrer 55
SFX b3 eter èteriez eter 55
SFX b3 eler èleriez eler 55
SFX b3 ecer èceraient/28 ecer 56
SFX b3 emer èmeraient/28 emer 56
SFX b3 ener èneraient/28 ener 56
SFX b3 eper èperaient/28 eper 56
SFX b3 erer èreraient/28 erer 56
SFX b3 eser èseraient/28 eser 56
SFX b3 ever èveraient/28 ever 56
SFX b3 evrer èvreraient/28 evrer 56
SFX b3 eter èteraient/28 eter 56
SFX b3 eler èleraient/28 eler 56
SFX b3 ecer èce/26 ecer 57
SFX b3 emer ème/26 emer 57
SFX b3 ener ène/26 ener 57
SFX b3 eper èpe/26 eper 57
SFX b3 erer ère/26 erer 57
SFX b3 eser èse/26 eser 57
SFX b3 ever ève/26 ever 57
SFX b3 evrer èvre/26 evrer 57
SFX b3 eter ète/26 eter 57
SFX b3 eler èle/26 eler 57
SFX b3 ecer èces/27 ecer 58
SFX b3 emer èmes/27 emer 58
SFX b3 ener ènes/27 ener 58
SFX b3 eper èpes/27 eper 58
SFX b3 erer ères/27 erer 58
SFX b3 eser èses/27 eser 58
SFX b3 ever èves/27 ever 58
SFX b3 evrer èvres/27 evrer 58
SFX b3 eter ètes/27 eter 58
SFX b3 eler èles/27 eler 58
SFX b3 ecer èce/28 ecer 59
SFX b3 emer ème/28 emer 59
SFX b3 ener ène/28 ener 59
SFX b3 eper èpe/28 eper 59
SFX b3 erer ère/28 erer 59
SFX b3 eser èse/28 eser 59
SFX b3 ever ève/28 ever 59
SFX b3 evrer èvre/28 evrer 59
SFX b3 eter ète/28 eter 59
SFX b3 eler èle/28 eler 59
SFX b3 er ions er 60
SFX b3 er iez er 61
SFX b3 ecer ècent/28 ecer 62
SFX b3 emer èment/28 emer 62
SFX b3 ener ènent/28 ener 62
SFX b3 eper èpent/28 eper 62
SFX b3 erer èrent/28 erer 62
SFX b3 eser èsent/28 eser 62
SFX b3 ever èvent/28 ever 62
SFX b3 evrer èvrent/28 evrer 62
SFX b3 eter ètent/28 eter 62
SFX b3 eler èlent/28 eler 62
SFX b3 er asse/26 [^c]er 63
SFX b3 cer çasse/26 cer 63
SFX b3 er asses/27 [^c]er 64
SFX b3 cer çasses/27 cer 64
SFX b3 er ât/28 [^c]er 65
SFX b3 cer çât/28 cer 65
SFX b3 er assions [^c]er 66
SFX b3 cer çassions cer 66
SFX b3 er assiez [^c]er 67
SFX b3 cer çassiez cer 67
SFX b3 er assent/28 [^c]er 68
SFX b3 cer çassent/28 cer 68
SFX b3 ecer èce/27 ecer 69
SFX b3 emer ème/27 emer 69
SFX b3 ener ène/27 ener 69
SFX b3 eper èpe/27 eper 69
SFX b3 erer ère/27 erer 69
SFX b3 eser èse/27 eser 69
SFX b3 ever ève/27 ever 69
SFX b3 evrer èvre/27 evrer 69
SFX b3 eter ète/27 eter 69
SFX b3 eler èle/27 eler 69
SFX b3 er ons [^c]er 70
SFX b3 cer çons cer 70
SFX b3 er ez er 71
